en: Video Transmitters
xx: Video Transmitters
cs: Zařízení pro přenos videa
da: Videosendeapparater
de: Videotransmitter
es: Transmisores de vídeo
fr: Transmetteurs vidéo
it: Videotrasmettitori
ja: ビデオトランスミッター
nl: Videotransmitters
no: Videosendere
pl: Transmitery wideo
pt: Transmissores AV
ru: Видеопередатчики
sv: Videosändare/mottagare
tr: Video Vericileri

en: Video Game Console Accessories
xx: Video Game Console Accessories
cs: Herní konzole – příslušenství
da: Videospilkonsol – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Videospielkonsolen
es: Accesorios para videoconsolas
fr: Accessoires pour consoles de jeu vidéo
it: Accessori console videogiochi
ja: ゲーム機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor videogameconsoles
no: Tilbehør til videospillkonsoller
pl: Akcesoria do gier wideo
pt: Acessórios para consoles de videogame
ru: Принадлежности для консолей видеоигр
sv: Tillbehör till dataspelskonsoler
tr: Video Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları

en: Home Game Console Accessories
xx: Home Game Console Accessories
cs: Domácí herní konzole – příslušenství
da: Hjemmespilkonsol – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Spielkonsolen
es: Accesorios para consolas de sobremesa
fr: Accessoires pour consoles de jeu de salon
it: Accessori console di gioco
ja: 家庭用テレビゲーム機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor gameconsole voor thuis
no: Tilbehør til spillkonsoller
pl: Akcesoria do domowych konsol do gier
pt: Acessórios para consoles caseiros
ru: Принадлежности для игровых консолей
sv: Tillbehör till hemdataspelkonsoler
tr: Ev Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları

en: Portable Game Console Accessories
xx: Portable Game Console Accessories
cs: Přenosné herní konzole – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til bærbar spilkonsol
de: Zubehör für mobile Spielkonsolen
es: Accesorios para consolas portátiles
fr: Accessoires pour consoles de jeu portables
it: Accessori console portatili
ja: 携帯型ゲーム機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor draagbare gameconsole
no: Tilbehør til bærbare spillkonsoller
pl: Akcesoria do przenośnych konsol do gier
pt: Acessórios para consoles de jogo portáteis
ru: Принадлежности для портативных игровых консолей
sv: Tillbehör till portabla spelkonsoler
tr: Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları

en: Video Game Consoles
xx: Video Game Consoles
cs: Herní konzole
da: Videospilkonsoller
de: Videospielkonsolen
es: Videoconsolas
fr: Consoles de jeu vidéo, Console de jeux
it: Console videogiochi
ja: テレビゲーム本体
nl: Videogameconsoles
no: Videospillkonsoller
pl: Konsole do gier wideo
pt: Consoles de videogame
ru: Консоли для видеоигр
sv: Spelkonsoler
tr: Video Oyun Konsolları

en: Tobacco Products, Tobacco-based products
xx: Tobacco Products
cs: Tabákové výrobky
da: Tobaksprodukter
de: Tabakprodukte
es: Productos del tabaco
fr: Articles pour fumeurs
it: Tabacco
ja: タバコ・喫煙具
nl: Tabaksproducten
no: Tobakksprodukter
pl: Wyroby tytoniowe
pt: Produtos de tabaco
ru: Табачные изделия
sv: Tobaksprodukter
tr: Tütün Mamülleri

en: Chewing Tobacco
xx: Chewing Tobacco
cs: Žvýkací tabák
da: Snus
de: Kautabak
es: Tabaco de mascar
fr: Tabac à chiquer
it: Tabacco da masticare
ja: 噛みタバコ
nl: Pruimtabak
no: Skråtobakk
pl: Tytoń do żucia
pt: Fumo para mascar
ru: Жевательный табак
sv: Tuggtobak
tr: Çiğneme Tütünü

en: Cigarettes
xx: Cigarettes
ar: سجائر
as: চিগাৰেট
az: Siqaretlər
be: Цыгарэты
bg: Цигари
bn: সিগারেট
cs: Cigarety
da: Cigaretter
de: Zigaretten
el: Τσιγάρα
es: Cigarrillos
et: Sigaretid
fa: سیگار
fi: Savukkeet
fr: Cigarettes
ga: Toitíní
gu: સિગારેટ
hi: सिगरेट
hr: Cigarete
hu: Cigaretták
hy: Ծխախոտ
id: Rokok
is: Sígarettur
it: Sigarette
ja: 紙巻タバコ, 煙草
jw: Rokok
ka: სიგარეტი
kk: Темекі
km: បារី
kn: ಸಿಗರೇಟುಗಳು
ko: 담배
ky: Тамеки
lt: Cigaretes
lv: Cigaretes
mk: Цигари
ml: സിഗരറ്റുകൾ
mn: Тамхи
mr: सिगारेट
ms: Rokok
mt: Sigaretti
my: စီးကရက်
ne: चुरोट
nl: Sigaretten
no: Sigaretter
or: ସିଗାରେଟ୍
pa: ਸਿਗਰਟ
pl: Papierosy
ps: سګرټ
pt: Cigarros
ro: Țigări
ru: Сигареты
sd: سگريٽ
si: සිගරට්
sk: Cigarety
sl: Cigarete
so: Sigaar
sq: Cigarete
sr: Цигарете
sv: Cigaretter
sw: Sigara
ta: சிகரெட்
te: సిగరెట్లు
tg: Сигарет
th: บุหรี่
tk: Temmäki
tl: Sigarilyo
tr: Sigara
uk: Цигарки
ur: سگریٹ
uz: Sigaret
vi: Thuốc lá
xh: Icuba
yo: Siga
zh: 香烟
zu: Ugwayi

en: Cigars
xx: Cigars
cs: Doutníky
da: Cigarer
de: Zigarren
es: Puros
fr: Cigares
it: Sigari
ja: 葉巻・シガー
nl: Sigaren
no: Sigarer
pl: Cygara
pt: Charutos
ru: Сигары
sv: Cigarrer
tr: Puro

en: Loose Tobacco
xx: Loose Tobacco
cs: Volně prodejný tabák
da: Tobak i løsvægt
de: Tabak
es: Tabaco de liar
fr: Tabac en vrac
it: Tabacco sfuso
ja: 葉タバコ
nl: Losse tabak
no: Løs tobakk
pl: Tytoń sypki
pt: Fumo solto
ru: Разрыхленный табак
sv: Löstobak
tr: İşlenmemiş Tütün

en: Smoking Pipes
xx: Smoking Pipes
cs: Dýmky
da: Rygepiber
de: Pfeifen
es: Pipas de fumar
fr: Pipes
it: Pipe da tabacco
ja: 喫煙用パイプ
nl: Pijpen
no: Røykepiper
pl: Fajki do palenia
pt: Cachimbos
ru: Курительные трубки
sv: Rökpipor
tr: Pipolar

en: Vaporizers & Electronic Cigarettes
xx: Vaporizers & Electronic Cigarettes
cs: Odpařovače a elektronické cigarety
da: E-cigaretter
de: Vaporizer & Rauchlose Zigaretten
es: Vaporizadores y cigarrillos electrónicos
fr: Vaporisateurs et cigarettes électroniques
it: Sigarette elettroniche
ja: 電子タバコ
nl: Verdampers en elektronische sigaretten
no: E-sigaretter
pl: E-papierosy i waporyzery
pt: Cigarros eletrônicos e vaporizadores
ru: Вапорайзеры и электронные сигареты
sv: Elektriska cigaretter
tr: Vaporizatörler ve Elektronik Sigaralar

en: Electronic Cigarettes
xx: Electronic Cigarettes
cs: Elektronické cigarety
da: Elektroniske cigaretter
de: Rauchlose Zigaretten
es: Cigarrillos electrónicos
fr: Cigarettes électroniques, Cigarette électronique
it: Sigaretta elettronica
ja: 電子たばこ
nl: E-sigaretten
no: Elektroniske sigaretter
pl: Papierosy elektroniczne
pt: Cigarros eletrônicos
ru: Электронные сигареты
sv: E-cigaretter
tr: Tanksız Elektronik Sigaralar

en: Vaporizers
xx: Vaporizers
cs: Vaporizéry
da: Vaporizere
de: Vaporizer
es: Vaporizadores
fr: Vaporettes
it: Vaporizzatori
ja: ヴェポライザー
nl: Vaporizers
no: Fordampere
pl: Waporyzatory
pt: Vaporizadores
ru: Вапорайзеры
sv: Vaporizers
tr: Tanklı Elektronik Sigaralar

en: Furniture
xx: Furniture
cs: Nábytek
da: Møbler
de: Möbel
es: Mobiliario, Muebles
fr: Meubles, Meuble
it: Arredamento
ja: 家具
nl: Meubelen
no: Møbler
pl: Meble
pt: Móveis
ru: Мебель
sv: Möbler
tr: Mobilyalar

en: Furniture
xx: Furniture
cs: Nábytek
da: Møbler
de: Möbel
es: Mobiliario, Muebles
fr: Meubles
it: Arredamento
ja: 家具
nl: Meubelen
no: Møbler
pl: Meble
pt: Móveis
ru: Мебель
sv: Möbler
tr: Mobilyalar

en: Baby & Toddler Furniture
xx: Baby & Toddler Furniture
cs: Nábytek pro děti a kojence
da: Møbler til baby og småbørn
de: Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel
es: Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Mobili per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用家具
nl: Meubelen voor baby's en peuters
no: Baby- og småbarnsmøbler
pl: Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Móveis para bebês
ru: Мебель для младенцев
sv: Möbler för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları

en: Baby & Toddler Furniture Sets
xx: Baby & Toddler Furniture Sets
cs: Sada nábytku pro miminka a batolata
da: Møbelsæt til baby og småbørn
de: Möbelgarnituren für Babies & Kleinkinder
es: Conjuntos de mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Meubles pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Set di mobili per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用家具セット
nl: Meubelsets voor baby's en peuters
no: Sett med baby- og småbarnsmøbler
pl: Zestawy mebli dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Conjuntos de móveis infantis
ru: Наборы мебели для младенцев
sv: Möbelpaket för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilya Takımları

en: Bassinet & Cradle Accessories
xx: Bassinet & Cradle Accessories
cs: Dětské koše a kolébky – příslušenství
da: Kurvevugge og vugge – tilbehør
de: Wiegen- & Stubenwagenzubehör
es: Accesorios para moisés y cunas
fr: Accessoires pour couffins et berceaux
it: Accessori per culle
ja: バシネット・ゆりかご用品
nl: Accessoires voor babybedjes en wiegjes
no: Tilbehør til babykurver og vugger
pl: Akcesoria do koszyków i kołysek
pt: Acessórios para berços e moisés
ru: Принадлежности для колыбелей и люлек
sv: Tillbehör till babykorgar och vaggor
tr: Sepet Beşik ve Beşik Aksesuarları

en: Bassinets & Cradles
xx: Bassinets & Cradles
cs: Dětské koše a kolébky
da: Kurvevugger og vugger
de: Wiegen & Stubenwagen
es: Cunas y moisés
fr: Couffins et berceaux
it: Ceste e culle
ja: バシネット・ゆりかご
nl: Babybedjes en wiegjes
no: Babykurver og vugger
pl: Koszyki i kołyski
pt: Berços e moisés
ru: Колыбели и люльки
sv: Babykorgar och vaggor
tr: Sepet Beşikler ve Beşikler